Tennessee, session 114, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-214(a), is amended by inserting
the language "the executive director of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, an attorney
employed by the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, or" immediately after the language
"provided by".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-116(a), is amended by inserting
the language "the executive director of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, an attorney
employed by the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, or" immediately after the language
"provided by".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1506
010703
- 1 -